Hawaii statutes.
[§201-13.9] Medical marijuana;
economic and other data; collection. (a) The department shall
continuously collect de‑identified information regarding the medical
marijuana registry and dispensary programs established pursuant to chapters 329
and 329D, including but not limited to information regarding the:

(1) Quantities of marijuana cultivated and dispensed;

(2) Number of qualifying patients;

(3) Geographic areas in which marijuana is cultivated
and consumed;

(4) Prices of marijuana and related products;

(5) Number of employment opportunities related to
marijuana; and

(6) Economic impact of marijuana cultivation and
sales.

(b) The department of health and dispensaries
licensed pursuant to chapter 329D shall provide de-identified aggregated data as
required by the department pursuant to this section.

(c) Upon request, the department shall provide
an analysis of the aggregated de-identified data to the department of health
and the legislature. [L 2016, c 230, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next